Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
OREGON DISASTER RESPONSE ASSISTANCE MATCHING FUND
SECTION 1. (1) The Oregon Disaster Response Assistance Matching Fund is established
in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. The Oregon Disaster
Response Assistance Matching Fund consists of moneys  appropriated, allocated, deposited
or transferred to the fund by the Legislative  Assembly or otherwise. Moneys in the fund are
continuously appropriated to the Oregon Department of Emergency  Management for the
purposes specified in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(2) When the receipt of federal grants or other federal aid related to disaster response
is conditioned on the contribution of matching funds by the  recipient, the department may
provide grants from the fund to local governments to  be used to contribute such matching
funds.
(3) The department may provide grants from  the fund to local governments in order to
assist or support disaster response efforts.
(4) The department may adopt rules necessary for the administration of this section.
(5) As used in this section, “local government” has the meaning given that term  in ORS
174.116.
VOLUNTEER TAX BENEFITS
SECTION 2.
The Legislative Revenue Officer shall  conduct a study of potential means
of granting a tax benefit  to emergency management volunteers. Not later than September
15, 2024, the officer shall submit a report  of the findings of the study, in the manner provided
by ORS 192.245,  to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to revenue,
and may include recommendations for legislation in the report.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
OREGON DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT COMPLIANCE DIVISION
Enrolled House Bill 3059 (HB 3059-B) Page 1
SECTION 4. (1) There is established the Compliance Division as an  administrative divi-
sion of the  Oregon Department of Emergency Management. The Director of the Oregon De-
partment of Emergency Management shall appoint a  compliance officer to lead the division.
The compliance officer serves  at the pleasure of and at the direction of the director. The
director may appoint additional staff to the division as the director deems necessary for  the
division to carry out its duties.
(2) The Compliance Division shall:
(a) Ensure that the department is in compliance with  requirements and regulations re-
lating to moneys received  from the federal government, including ensuring compliance by
grantees or subgrantees;
(b) Prepare and maintain documentation related to compliance;
(c) Establish monitoring and reporting requirements as necessary to ensure compliance;
(d) Identify compliance risks and direct and supervise corrective  actions to mitigate such
risks; and
(e) Serve as liaison between the department and federal officials.
(3) Public bodies, as defined in ORS 174.109, shall promptly provide to the  Compliance
Division any books,  records or other documentation that the division determines to be nec-
essary to carry out its duties.
VOLUNTEER PAID LEAVE
SECTION 5.
 ORS 401.378 is amended to read:
401.378. [(1)] State  agencies and political subdivisions described in ORS 243.325 (2) to (6) may
grant leaves of absence to any public employee who [ is a certified disaster services volunteer of the
American Red Cross ] volunteers to participate in  disaster relief or recovery  services in the State
of Oregon. Cumulative leave granted shall not exceed 15 work days in any 12-month period. Such
leave granted shall not result in a loss of compensation, seniority, vacation time, sick leave or  ac-
crued overtime for which the employee  is otherwise eligible. Compensation to an employee granted
leave under this section shall be  at the employee’s regular rate of pay for those regular work hours
during which the employee is absent from work.
[(2) As used in this section, “disaster” means those disasters designated at level II and above  by
the American Red Cross. ]
SUPPORT TO LOCAL ENTITIES
SECTION 6. (1) The Oregon Department of Emergency  Management shall provide tech-
nical assistance, as described in subsection (2)  of this section, to local entities, whether
public or private, that are active in emergency preparedness, response or recovery in
Oregon, including:
(a) County, city and tribal emergency management agencies;
(b) Community organizations active in disaster;
(c) Long-term recovery groups; and
(d) Disaster mitigation and recovery managers.
(2) Technical assistance provided  under this section may include, without limitation, as-
sistance with:
(a) Fundraising or grant writing;
(b) Incorporation or other organization;
(c) Navigating political relationships;
(d) Interacting with the Federal Emergency Management  Agency, including ensuring
proper form and content of paperwork submitted to the agency;
(e) Culturally specific outreach; and
(f) Branding.
Enrolled House Bill 3059 (HB 3059-B) Page 2
(3) The department may contract with third parties to carry out its  duties under this
section.
(4) The department shall adopt rules necessary for the administration of this section.
SECTION 7.
(1) As used in  this section, “community organization active in disaster”
means a cooperative organization comprising representatives of  nonprofit, governmental,
business and faith-based entities that works  within a local community to prepare for, build
resilience against and recover from emergencies  by performing functions including any of
the following:
(a) Providing local coordination of federal or state support;
(b) Serving as a primary local disaster recovery organization;
(c) Assessing local needs following disaster  and determining locally informed plans for
action;
(d) Facilitating communication with local communities, including vulnerable  populations;
(e) Leveraging philanthropic and  other private funding and coordinating with
philanthropic entities;
(f) Facilitating disaster case management, including providing a central hub for allocating
resources for unmet needs; and
(g) Providing emergency-related services and supports to the local community.
(2) The Oregon Department of Emergency  Management shall identify existing community
organizations active in disaster in Oregon and provide  grants for their support. The depart-
ment shall execute grant agreements with grant recipients obligating recipients to use grant
moneys for purposes specified by the department. The  department shall determine the per-
missible purposes for a grant under this section  based on the needs of the community or-
ganization active in disaster and the locality in which it operates.
(3) The department shall adopt rules necessary for the administration of this section.
FISCAL PROVISIONS
SECTION 8.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department  of Emergency Management, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, for deposit into the Oregon Dis-
aster Response Assistance Matching Fund established in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,000,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by  the Oregon Department of Emergency Management from the Oregon
Disaster Response  Assistance Matching Fund established in section 1 of this 2023 Act, for
making grants to local governments to assist or support disaster response efforts.
SECTION 10. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Emergency  Management, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,026,142 to carry out  the provisions
of section 4 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 11. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of  Emergency Management, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $242,714 to carry out the provisions of
section 7 of this 2023 Act.
UNIT CAPTIONS
SECTION 12. The unit captions used in this 2023 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2023 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 3059 (HB 3059-B) Page 3
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 13. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 14, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3059 (HB 3059-B) Page 4